Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.240

Effect of reversal of judgment on appeal.

If an action shall be commenced within the time prescribed therefor, and a judgment therein for the plaintiff be reversed on error or appeal, the plaintiff, or if he or she dies and the cause of action survives, his or her heirs or representatives may commence a new action within one year after reversal.

[ 2011 c 336 s 86; Code 1881 s 41; 1877 p 10 s 42; 1854 p 365 s 15; RRS s 173.]